Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.130

Self-directed investment—Default investment options—Duties of state investment board and department—Expenses—Recordkeeping.

(1) The state investment board has the full authority to invest all self-directed investment moneys in accordance with RCW 43.84.150 and 43.33A.140, the default investment options set forth in RCW 41.34.060(1), and cumulative investment directions received pursuant to RCW 41.34.060 and this section. In carrying out this authority the state investment board, after consultation with the department regarding any recommendations made pursuant to RCW 41.50.088(1)(b), shall provide a set of options for members to choose from for self-directed investment.

(2) All investment and operating costs of the state investment board associated with making self-directed investments or the default investment options set forth in RCW 41.34.060(1) shall be paid by members and recovered under procedures agreed to by the department and the state investment board pursuant to the principles set forth in RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. All other expenses caused by self-directed investment shall be paid by the member in accordance with rules established by the department under RCW 41.50.088. With the exception of these expenses, all earnings from self-directed investments shall accrue to the member's account.

(3)(a)(i) The department shall keep or cause to be kept full and adequate accounts and records of each individual member's account. The department shall account for and report on the investment of defined contribution assets or may enter into an agreement with the state investment board for such accounting and reporting under this chapter.

(ii) The department's duties related to individual participant accounts include conducting the activities of trade instruction, settlement activities, and direction of cash movement and related wire transfers with the custodian bank and outside investment firms.

(iii) The department has sole responsibility for contracting with any recordkeepers for individual participant accounts and shall manage the performance of recordkeepers under those contracts.

(b)(i) The department's duties under (a)(ii) of this subsection do not limit the authority of the state investment board to conduct its responsibilities for asset management and balancing of the deferred compensation funds.

(ii) The state investment board has sole responsibility for contracting with outside investment firms to provide investment management for the deferred compensation funds and shall manage the performance of investment managers under those contracts.

(c) The state treasurer shall designate and define the terms of engagement for the custodial banks.

[ 2011 c 80 s 1; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 34; 2001 c 181 s 3; 1998 c 341 s 307.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See note following RCW 41.34.060.